Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 20 IDAHO PLANT PEST ACT OF 2002
§ 22-2019. Infestations — Control and eradication costs — Deficiency warrants — Cooperation with other entities and citizens.

Whenever the director determines that there exists the threat of an infestation of grasshoppers, crickets or exotic plant pests on state-owned land, private, range or agricultural land, and that the infestation is of such a character as to be a menace to state, private, range or agricultural land, the director shall cause the infestation to be controlled and eradicated, using such funds as have been appropriated or may hereafter be made available for such purposes. Provided however, that whenever the cost of control and eradication exceeds the funds appropriated or otherwise available for that purpose, the state board of examiners may authorize the issuance of deficiency warrants against the general fund for up to five million dollars ($5,000,000) in any one (1) year for such control and eradication. Control and eradication costs may include, but are not limited to, costs for survey, detection, inspection, diagnosis, treatment, and disposal of infected or infested plants and plant materials, cleaning and disinfecting of infected premises and indemnity paid to owners for infected or infested plants and plant materials destroyed by order of the director. The director, in executing the provisions of this chapter insofar as it relates to control and eradication, shall have the authority to cooperate with federal, state, county and municipal agencies and private citizens in control and eradication efforts; provided, that in the case of joint federal/state programs the state funds shall only be used to pay the state’s share of the cost of the control and eradication efforts. Such moneys as the state shall thus become liable for shall be paid as a part of the expenses of the department of agriculture out of appropriations which shall be made by the legislature for that purpose from the general fund of the state. In all appropriations hereafter made for expenses of the department of agriculture, account shall be taken of and provision made for this item of expense.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-2019, as added by 2006, ch. 197, § 3, p. 611.

§ 22-2020. Penalties for violations.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or of the rules promulgated hereunder for carrying out the provisions of this chapter, or who fails or refuses to comply with any requirements herein specified, or who interferes with the department, its agents or employees, in the execution, or on account of the execution of its or their duties under this chapter or rules promulgated hereunder, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or be imprisoned in a county jail for not more than twelve (12) months or be subject to both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or any rules promulgated hereunder may be assessed a civil penalty by the department or its duly authorized agent of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each offense and shall be liable for reasonable attorney’s fees.

Assessment of a civil penalty may be made in conjunction with any other department administrative action.

No civil penalty may be assessed unless the person charged was given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the Idaho administrative procedure act.

If the department is unable to collect such penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the department, it may recover such amount by action in the appropriate district court.

Any person against whom the department has assessed a civil penalty under the provisions of this section may, within thirty (30) days of the final action by the agency making the assessment, appeal the assessment to the district court of the county in which the violation is alleged by the department to have occurred.

All civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the agricultural department inspection fund.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the director to report minor violations for prosecution when he believes that the public interest will be best served by suitable warnings or other administrative action.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-2020, as added by 2002, ch. 89, § 2, p. 210.

§ 22-2021. Cooperation with other jurisdictions.

The department may enter into cooperative agreements with organizations including, but not limited to: persons, civic groups, or governmental agencies, to adopt and execute plans to detect and control areas infested or infected with plant pests. Such cooperative agreements may include provisions of joint funding of any control treatment.

If a plant pest occurs and cannot be adequately controlled by individual person(s), owner(s), tenant(s) or local units of government, the department may conduct the necessary control measures independently or on a cooperative basis with federal or other units of government.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-2021, as added by 2002, ch. 89, § 2, p. 210.

§ 22-2022. Severability.

If any section, sentence, clause, phrase, or other portion of this chapter is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, the decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions thereof.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-2022, as added by 2002, ch. 89, § 2, p. 210.

§ 22-2023. No effect on existing liability.

The enactment of this chapter does not terminate or modify any civil or criminal liability relating to plant pests which exists prior to the effective date of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-2023, as added by 2002, ch. 89, § 2, p. 210.